Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.120

Out-of-state private investigators operating across state lines.

Private investigators or armed private investigators whose duties require them to operate across state lines may operate in this state for up to thirty days per year, if they are properly registered and certified in another state with training and certification requirements that the director finds are at least equal to the requirements of this state.

[ 1995 c 277 s 30; 1991 c 328 s 12.]